trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
<pardef n="hello__ij">

      
                              <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


<!-- Paradigna NOM-->



 <pardef n="nom__n">
      <e>
      <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
      <e>
      <p>
         <l>j</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>

      <e>
      <p>
         <l>n</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
      <e>
      <p>
         <l>jn</l>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
   </e>
 </pardef>

 <pardef n="nomf__n">
      <e>
     <p>
       <l/>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
       <e>
     <p>
       <l>j</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

      <e>
     <p>
       <l>n</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
       <e>
     <p>
       <l>jn</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>


 <pardef n="nommf__n">
      <e>
     <p>
       <l>o</l>
       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
       <e>
     <p>
       <l>oj</l>
       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>

      <e>
     <p>
       <l>ino</l>
       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
       <e>
     <p>
       <l>inoj</l>
       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>


      <e>
     <p>
       <l>on</l>
       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
       <e>
     <p>
       <l>ojn</l>
       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
      <e>
     <p>
       <l>inon</l>
       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
       <e>
     <p>
       <l>inojn</l>
       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
     </p>
   </e>
  </pardef>

<!-- Paradigma article -->


   <pardef n="la__det">

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="mia__det">

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>jn</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="dem__det">

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>jn</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

	 
    <pardef n="ind__det">

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>jn</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="quant__det">

                              <e r="LR">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nomi"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

                              <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>jn</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="afgano"><i>afgan</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="altitudo"><i>altitudo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="amiko"><i>amik</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="aristokrato"><i>aristokrat</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="arpeĝo"><i>arpeĝo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="aviadisto"><i>aviadist</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="barilo"><i>barilo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="biografo"><i>biograf</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="broĉo"><i>broĉo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="ĉarpentaĵo"><i>ĉarpentaĵo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="ĉefo"><i>ĉef</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="detektivo"><i>detektiv</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="direkcio"><i>direkcio</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="dunganto"><i>dungant</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="ekzemplero"><i>ekzemplero</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="entomologo"><i>entomolog</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="familinomo"><i>familinomo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="fazano"><i>fazan</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="fonduso"><i>fonduso</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="fripono"><i>fripon</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="generalo"><i>general</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="genuo"><i>genuo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="gufo"><i>guf</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="harplektaĵo"><i>harplektaĵo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="idioto"><i>idiot</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="indikatoro"><i>indikatoro</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="intelektulo"><i>intelektul</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="kabareto"><i>kabareto</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="kamenskrapisto"><i>kamenskrapist</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="karpo"><i>karpo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="kato"><i>kat</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="koktelo"><i>koktelo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="komikso"><i>komiks</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="korako"><i>korako</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="kubano"><i>kuban</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="kurbo"><i>kurbo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="lernanto"><i>lernant</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="limfo"><i>limfo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="manĉuro"><i>manĉur</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="manekeno"><i>manekeno</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="metamorfozo"><i>metamorfozo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="monaĥo"><i>monaĥ</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="niĝeriano"><i>niĝerian</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="okultismo"><i>okultismo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="pakistanano"><i>pakistanan</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="pilko"><i>pilko</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="polico"><i>polic</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="pulvoro"><i>pulvoro</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="rekruto"><i>rekrut</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="saŭco"><i>saŭco</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="stiluso"><i>stiluso</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="stratulaĉo"><i>stratulaĉ</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="tezo"><i>tezo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="ugandano"><i>ugandan</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="vermuto"><i>vermuto</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="marko"><i>marko</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="artisto"><i>artist</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="encefalopatio"><i>encefalopatio</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="mineralogo"><i>mineralog</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="rozeo"><i>rozeo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="jankio"><i>janki</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="provizado"><i>provizado</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="dano"><i>dan</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="malaja"><i>malaj</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="kukumo"><i>kukumo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="helpanto"><i>helpant</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="korupto"><i>korupto</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="luprenanto"><i>luprenant</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="monaĥinejo"><i>monaĥinejo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="vendisto"><i>vendist</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="zarzuelo"><i>zarzuelo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="toksomaniulo"><i>toksomaniul</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="precedenco"><i>precedenco</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="gardado"><i>gardad</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="senokupeco"><i>senokupeco</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="ricevilo"><i>ricevil</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="folibeto"><i>folibeto</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="naturisto"><i>naturist</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="lepado"><i>lepado</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="laŭrencio"><i>laŭrencio</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="haltsignalo"><i>haltsignalo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="la"><i>la</i><par n="la__det"/></e>
<e lm="mia"><i>mia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="via"><i>via</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="lia"><i>lia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="ŝia"><i>ŝia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="ĝia"><i>ĝia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="nia"><i>nia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="ilia"><i>ilia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="certa"><i>certa</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="ambaŭ"><i>ambaŭ</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="tia"><i>tia</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="tiu"><i>tiu</i><par n="dem__det"/></e>
<e lm="alia"><i>alia</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="la alia"><i>la<b/>alia</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="la sama"><i>la<b/>sama</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="diversa"><i>diversa</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="ajna"><i>ajna</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="iu"><i>iu</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="ĉiu"><i>ĉiu</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="ĉiu"><i>ĉiu</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="neniu"><i>neniu</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="multa"><i>multa</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="malmulta"><i>malmulta</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="kelka"><i>kelka</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
